Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-3422
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying
and construing the Nebraska Uniform Real Property Transfer on Death Act, consideration
must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to
its subject matter among the states that enact it.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 22.